sl-SI: Gradbeništvo: Prevlečeno; Polnjeno; Prevlečena; Strukturna; Tonirano; Vermeil; Celi; Drugo
lt-LT: Statyba: Plakiruotas; Užpildytas; Dengtas; Kietas; Tonuotas; Paauksuotas; Nepjaustyta; Kita
sv: Konstruktion: Klädd; Fylld; Pläterad; Solid; Tonad; Vermeil; Hel; Övrigt
ja: 構造: クラッド; 満たされた; メッキ; ソリッド; トーン調整済み; ヴェルメイユ; 全体; その他
it: Costruzione: Placcato; Riempito; Placcato; Solido; Tonalizzato; Vermeil; Intero; Altro
ro-RO: Construcție: Îmbrăcat; Umplută cu aer; Placat; Solidă; Tonat / colorat; Vermeil; Costiță; Altele
da: Byggeri: Klædt; Fyldt; Belagt; Solid; Tonet; Vermeil; Hel; Andet
cs: Stavebnictví: Obložená; Plněná; Pokovený; Pevná; Tónovaná; Vermeil; Celé; Jiné
hu: Építés: Borított; Töltött; Futtatott; Tömör; Tónusos; Aranyozott ezüst; Egész; Egyéb
ru: Строительство: Многослойный; С наполнителем; С покрытием; Цельное; Тонированный; Вермель; Целиком; Другой
th: การจัดทำ: หุ้ม; ถม; ชุบ; โซลิด; เฉดสี; ชุบเวอร์เมิล; ทั้งชิ้น; อื่นๆ
es: Construcción: Revestido; Relleno; Chapado; Sólido; Tonalizado; Vermeil; Entero; Otros
ko: 구성: 클래드; 충전; 도금; 솔리드; 토닝; 금도금; 전체; 기타
zh-TW: 營造建設: 覆層; 填充; 電鍍; 實心; 上色; 鍍金; 全部; 其他
en: Construction: Clad; Filled; Plated; Solid; Toned; Vermeil; Whole; Other
nb: Byggevarer: Kledd; Fylt; Belagt; Fast; Tonet; Vermeil; Hel; Annet
pt-BR: Construção: Revestido; Preenchido; Banhado; Maciço; Tonificado; Vermeil; Integral; Outro
nl: Bouw: Bekleed; Gevuld; Verguld; Stevig; Getint; Vermeil; Geheel; Andere
sk-SK: Spracovanie: Pokrytý; Naplnený; Pokovované; Solid; Tónovaný; Pozlátené striebro; Celý; Iné
el: Κατασκευές: Με επένδυση; Με πλήρωση; Επιμεταλλωμένο; Στερεάς μορφής; Με απόχρωση; Vermeil; Πλήρες; Άλλο
tr: İnşaat: Giyinmiş; Dolgulu; Kaplama; Düz; Tonlu; Altın kaplamalı gümüş; Tüm; Diğer
hr-HR: Izrada: Obloženo; Ispunjeno; Obložen; Čvrsti; Tonirano; Pozlaćeno; Cjelovito; Ostalo
bg-BG: Строителство: Облечено; Запълнено; Покритие; Твърдо; Тонизирано; Вермейл; Цяла; Други
fr: Construction: Blindé; Laminé; Plaqué; Solide; Teinté; Vermeil; Entier; Autre
pl: Konstrukcja: Powlekane; Wypełnione; Platerowany; Stały; Tonowane; Vermeil (srebro pozłacane); Całe; Inne
zh-CN: 加工方法: 包覆; 包金; 镀金; 实心; 镀色; 银镀金; 一体成型; 其他
de: Baugewerbe: Gekleidet; Gefüllt; Vergoldet; Solide; Straff; Vermeil; Ganz; Sonstiges
pt-PT: Construção: Revestido; Preenchido; Banhado; Sólido; Tonalizado; Vermeil; Gordo; Outro
fi: Valmistusmenetelmä: Verhottu; Täytetty; Pinnoitettu; Kiinteä; Sävytetty; Vermeil; Kokonainen; Muu
vi: Xây dựng: Tráng; Đầy; Mạ; Lốp rắn; Có tông màu; Bạc/đồng mạ vàng; Nguyên; Khác